District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.73a

Downtown retail priority area-demonstration project.

In the case of the Downtown Retail Priority Area, Retail Development Projects shall include, on a demonstration project basis, one or more restaurants; provided, that the total amount of Bonds available for such demonstration projects shall not be greater than 3% of the aggregate principal amount of Bonds authorized pursuant to § 2-1217.72(a). Notwithstanding the defined boundaries of the Downtown Retail Priority Area, the Mayor shall use best efforts to ensure that at least one demonstration project is located in Ward 7 or 8. Not later than 3 years from the issuance of Bonds for demonstration projects, the CFO shall report to the Mayor and the Council regarding the economic effects on the District of such projects.

Sept. 8, 2004, D.C. Law 15-185, § 4a
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 7112(d), 57 DCR 6242

History

This section is referenced in § 2-1217.71.

Section References

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7112(d) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Emergency Legislation